Washington statutes.
RCW 36.56.060

Apportionment of budgeted funds—Transfer and adjustment of funds, accounts and records.

If apportionments of budgeted funds are required because of the transfers authorized by this chapter, the county budget office shall certify such apportionments to the agencies and local governmental units affected and to the state auditor. Each of these shall make the appropriate transfer and adjustments in funds and appropriation accounts and equipment records in accordance with such certification.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 277 s 6.]